Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2426.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 17(a) of the act of March 29, 1803 (P.L.542, No.156), entitled "An act to establish a Board of Wardens for the port of Philadelphia, and for the regulation of pilots and pilotages, and for other purposes therein mentioned," is amended to read:Section 17. (a) Every person not now a licensed pilot, and who desires to exercise the profession of pilot in the Delaware Bay and River, shall apply to the Navigation Commission for the Delaware River and its navigable tributaries for a license to entitle the person to follow that occupation; and it shall be the duty of the Navigation Commission to call to their 123456789101112131415161718 assistance as many pilots of the first class as they may see fit, not less than three in number, to examine every person so applying, as to the person's fitness in all respects to perform the duties of a pilot, and to grant licenses to all such as they deem qualified, according to their respective abilities: Those of the first class, to persons capable of piloting vessels of any practicable draught of water; those of the second class, to persons capable of piloting vessels drawing forty-five feet of water, or under; those of the third class, to persons capable of piloting vessels drawing forty feet of water, or under; those of the fourth class, to persons capable of piloting vessels drawing thirty-five feet of water, or under; those of the fifth class, to persons capable of piloting vessels drawing thirty-two feet of water or under; and those of the sixth class, to persons capable of piloting vessels drawing [twenty-seven] twenty-nine feet of water or under; which licenses shall be in force for one year from the date thereof, and until the pilots, respectively, shall next after the expiration of the year, arrive with any vessel at the Port of Philadelphia, and no longer; but every pilot delivering up the person's license shall be entitled to receive a new one in lieu thereof, giving like security as hereinafter directed, unless it shall appear to the Navigation Commission that the person applying is disqualified from exercising the duties of a pilot; and if any person shall in any manner exercise or attempt to exercise the profession of a pilot, except in vessels under one hundred tons burden, in the Delaware Bay or River without license duly granted, or at any time after the person's license shall have expired, the person shall be liable for a civil penalty in an amount up to twice the amount of pilotage, as calculated under existing law, and shall 20260HB2426PN3281 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 also be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned for not less than one month nor more than one year, and be fined a sum not exceeding two hundred dollars, at the discretion of the court.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days IMMEDIATELY.20260HB2426PN3281 - 3 - <--<--1234567